Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 19 Sentence and Execution

12-19-1.
Repealed.

12-19-2.
Selection of method and amount or term of punishment.

Whenever it is provided that any offense shall be punished by a fine or imprisonment, the court imposing punishment may, in its discretion, select the kind of punishment to be imposed, and, if the punishment is fine or imprisonment, its amount or term within the limits prescribed by law; provided, if the punishment to be imposed is imprisonment, the sentence or sentences imposed shall be reduced by the number of days spent in confinement while awaiting trial and while awaiting sentencing; and provided, further, that in the case of a person sentenced to a life sentence, the time at which he or she shall become eligible to apply for parole shall be reduced by the number of days spent in confinement while awaiting trial and while awaiting sentencing; and any sentence or sentences in effect at present, including the provision as to a life sentence as described in this subsection may be reduced in like manner by the court which imposed the sentence upon application by the person serving the sentence to the court.

The court upon the sentencing of a first-time offender, excluding capital offense and sex offense involving minors, may in appropriate cases sentence the person to a term of imprisonment, and allow the person to continue in his or her usual occupation or education and shall order the person to be confined in a minimum security facility at the A.C.I. during his or her nonworking or study hours.

The director of corrections or his or her designee may impose any conditions and restrictions upon the release of persons sentenced under this section that he or she deems necessary.

The director of corrections may at any time, subject to the approval of the director, recall a prisoner from release status if he or she believes or has reason to believe the peace, safety, welfare, or security of the community may be endangered by the prisoner being under release status. Any prisoner recalled under this subsection shall be presented to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the classification board for its further consideration.

A prisoner authorized to work at paid employment in the community under this section may be required to pay, and the director is authorized to collect, costs incident to the prisoner’s confinement as the director deems appropriate and reasonable. These collections shall be deposited with the treasurer as a part of the general revenue of the state.

When a sentenced inmate’s parole release date or completion of sentence falls on a weekend or on a holiday, the department of corrections may release the inmate on the prior business day.

When a sentenced inmate is scheduled to be released from the custody of the department of corrections to a community partner for residential treatment and/or to a facility to maintain stable living conditions, and the inmate’s release date or completion of sentence is incompatible with the capacity, staffing, or scheduling capabilities of the community partner facility, the department of corrections may release the inmate up to three (3) business days earlier than the scheduled release date, provided the inmate transitions directly from the department of corrections to the community partner facility.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 47; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 47; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 48; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 48; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 48; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-2

; P.L. 1968, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 8; P.L. 1988, ch. 619, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 216, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 217, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

12-19-2.1.
Crimes committed in a public housing for the elderly project.

Whenever a person has been found guilty of an offense described in subsection (b) of this section which was committed while on the premises of a public housing for the elderly project and upon a resident of the project, the court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years in addition to any other punishment which the court, in its discretion, may impose.

This section shall apply to any offense in the following categories: (1) assault and battery; (2) statutory burning of personal property; (3) larceny of property or money of a value not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500); (4) and any other crime, excluding motor vehicle offenses, which results in personal injury or death, unless a maximum sentence of greater than five (5) years is provided elsewhere in the general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 238, § 1.

12-19-2.2.
Alternative confinement.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, whenever a defendant is convicted of a nonviolent criminal offense and is between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-eight (28) and receives a maximum sentence of three (3) years or less to serve, and the department of corrections is satisfied that the ends of justice and the best interests of the public as well as the offender will be served by it, the director of the department of corrections may make application to the sentencing judge for an order that the convicted offender be placed in a well structured highly disciplined shock incarceration program administered by the department of corrections. The program shall include extensive physical regimentation, drug and alcohol abuse counseling, behavioral counseling and mandatory education courses and community restitution. This program will be open to first time offenders.

For the purpose of this section, “first time offender” is defined as an individual who has not been incarcerated pursuant to a conviction.

The written application by the director to the sentencing judge for an order directing that a sentenced person be confined in the shock incarceration program shall set forth his or her reason for seeking the order. The hearing on the application shall be held within ten (10) business days following the filing of the application. If the sentencing judge is unavailable to hear and consider the application the presiding justice of the superior court shall designate another judge to do so.

The program shall be not less than one hundred eighty (180) days nor more than two hundred (200) days in duration and shall be operated in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department of corrections and as otherwise provided for by law.

The director or his or her designee shall report to the sentencing court whether the convicted offender completes or does not complete the program together with any additional information the director shall deem appropriate with respect to the offender’s conduct during the course of the program. Upon receipt of this report, the original sentencing judge may, upon his or her own order, in the event of successful completion, suspend but not vacate the remainder of the offender’s sentence and place the offender on probation as provided by this chapter; or upon his or her own order, in the event of unsuccessful completion, will confine the offender to the adult correctional institutions for the balance of the original sentence still remaining with credit being given for any time that may have been spent in the program. In the event that the unsuccessful completion of the program is the result of an additional criminal offense, then the additional sentence imposed for the new offense shall be in addition to and not concurrent with the original sentence.

Defendants convicted of a violent felony or previously convicted of a crime of violence shall not be eligible for this program.

“Violent felony” as used in this section means any one of the following crimes or an attempt to commit that crime:

Murder;

Manslaughter;

Sexual assault;

Mayhem;

Robbery;

Burglary;

Assault with a dangerous weapon; and

Assault or battery resulting in serious bodily injury.

The director of the department of corrections shall annually review the operation of the program and report his or her findings to the general assembly.

There shall be created within the department of corrections a special division which shall supervise those convicted offenders who were placed on probation as a result of completing this program.

The supervision of persons confined under the provisions of this section shall be conducted by the director or his designee.

The director shall have full power and authority to enforce any of the provisions of this section by regulation, subject to the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the department of corrections may contract with private agencies to carry out the provisions of this section. The civil liability of private agencies and their employees, acting within the scope of their employment, and carrying out the provisions of this section, shall be limited in the same manner and dollar amount as if they were agencies or employees of the state.

The state planning council established pursuant to the provisions of §

42-11-10

is authorized and directed to determine the most appropriate location for the program.

Alternative confinement pursuant to this section shall commence upon the approval by the general assembly of funding sufficient to carry out the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 435, § 1.

12-19-3.
Deodands — Benefit of clergy — Petit treason.

Deodands, the plea of the benefit of clergy, and the distinction between petit treason and murder, are abolished. Petit treason shall be prosecuted and punished as murder.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 50; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 50; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 51; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-3

.

12-19-4.
Corruption of blood — Forfeiture of estate.

No conviction or sentence for any offense whatsoever shall work corruption of blood or forfeiture of estate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 58; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 58; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-4

.

12-19-5.
Imprisonment to commence at expiration of previous term of imprisonment.

Whenever any person shall be convicted of any offense punishable by imprisonment, that person being at the time under sentence of imprisonment on a former conviction, the court passing the subsequent sentence may sentence the person to the term of imprisonment provided by law to commence at the expiration of the term of imprisonment under the former sentence or sentences.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 43; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 43; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 49; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 49; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 49; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-5

.

12-19-6.
Presentence reports.

Whenever an accused shall be found guilty after trial or shall plead guilty or nolo contendere on any charge for which a sentence of more than one year may be imposed, the court shall, before imposing sentence, have presented to it by the administrator of probation and parole a presentence report. All local and state police agencies shall furnish to the administrator of probation and parole any criminal records that the administrator may request.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 75; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-6

; P.L. 1961, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 25.

12-19-7.
Recommendations of counsel as to sentence.

At the time sentence shall be imposed by the court, the recommendation of the department of the attorney general and of defense counsel shall be recorded and a copy of the record shall be filed with the director of corrections.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 77; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-7

.

12-19-8.
Suspension of sentence and probation by superior or district court.

Application. Except where the suspension of sentence shall otherwise be prohibited by law, and subject to the purposes and limits imposed by this section and §

12-19-8.1

, whenever any defendant shall appear for sentence before the superior or district court, the court may impose a sentence and suspend the execution of the sentence, in whole or in part, or place the defendant on probation without the imposition of a suspended sentence. The suspension shall place the defendant on probation for the time of probation that the court may fix and pursuant to the terms and conditions set by §

12-19-8.1

.

Duration. The period of probation for a felony shall be set for a period of time as required by law, or in accordance with judicial sentencing benchmarks. The period of probation for a misdemeanor, where no sentence is imposed or where sentence is entirely suspended, may be for any period up to the maximum time of sentence provided by applicable statutes. Where sentence is imposed and suspended in part, the term ordered to be served and the period of probation together shall not exceed the maximum time of sentence provided by applicable statutes.

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 345, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 351, § 1].

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 18A; P.L. 1950, ch. 2462, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-8

; P.L. 1966, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 518, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 554, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 351, § 1.

12-19-8.1.
Conditions of probation.

The following shall constitute basic conditions of probation applicable to all defendants upon whom a period of probation has been imposed:

Obey all laws;

Report to the probation officer and parole officer as directed;

Remain within the state of Rhode Island except with the prior approval, specifically or as an agreed routine, of the probation and parole office;

Notify the probation and parole officer immediately of any change of address, telephone number, or employment;

Make every effort to keep steadily employed or attend school or vocational training;

Waive extradition from anywhere in the United States to Rhode Island, if required to appear in any Rhode Island court;

Provide a DNA sample if required by §§

12-1.5-7

and

12-1.5-8

;

Pay restitution, court costs, and fines, if assessed, in one or several sums, based on the defendant’s ability to pay; and

Submit to a risk and needs assessment.

Special probation conditions related to community service, computer restrictions, no contact orders, or any other conditions deemed just and reasonable may be imposed at the discretion of the court.

At any time during the term of a sentence imposed, the probation and parole unit of the department of corrections may seek permission of the superior or district court to modify a defendant’s basic conditions or special conditions of treatment or counseling by either imposing additional conditions or removing previously imposed conditions of probation to provide for more effective supervision of the defendant.

Failure of the defendant to comply with modified conditions of probation constitutes a violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 345, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 351, § 2.

12-19-9.
Violation of terms of probation — Notice to attorney general — Revocation or continuation of suspension.

Whenever any person who has been placed on probation pursuant to §

12-19-8

violates the terms and conditions of his or her probation as fixed by the court, the police or the probation authority shall inform the attorney general of the violation, and the attorney general shall cause the defendant to appear before the court. The department of corrections division of rehabilitative services shall promptly render a report relative to the conduct of the defendant, and the information contained in any report under §

12-13-24.1

. The division of rehabilitative services may recommend that the time served up to that point is a sufficient response to a violation that is not a new alleged crime. The court may order the defendant held without bail for a period not exceeding ten (10) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

The court shall conduct a hearing within thirty (30) days of arrest unless waived by the defendant to determine whether the defendant has violated the terms and conditions of his or her probation, at which hearing the defendant shall have the opportunity to be present and to respond. Upon a determination by a fair preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has violated the terms and conditions of his or her probation, the court, in open court and in the presence of the defendant, may:

Remove the suspension and order the defendant committed on the sentence previously imposed, or on a lesser sentence;

Impose a sentence if one has not been previously imposed;

Stay all or a portion of the sentence imposed after removal of the suspension;

Continue the suspension of a sentence previously imposed; or

Convert a sentence of probation without incarceration to a suspended sentence.

The court shall sentence for a violation under subsection (b) of this section in accordance with judicial sentencing benchmarks.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 18A; P.L. 1950, ch. 2462, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-9

; P.L. 1966, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 25; P.L. 1982, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 5, effective June 28, 2022.

12-19-10.
Suspension of imprisonment already commenced.

Imprisonment pursuant to a sentence, once commenced, shall not be subject to suspension by the superior court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 18A; P.L. 1950, ch. 2462, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-10

.

12-19-11.
Suspension of life sentence.

Execution of sentence shall not be suspended, nor shall the defendant be placed on probation, if the offense is one punishable by mandatory life imprisonment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 18A; P.L. 1950, ch. 2462, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-11

.

12-19-12.
Powers of superior court additional.

The power and authority vested by §§

12-19-8

—

12-19-11

in the superior court shall be deemed additional power and authority, and shall not be deemed to be in substitution or derogation of any other power and authority previously vested in the superior court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 18A; P.L. 1950, ch. 2462, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-12

.

12-19-13.
Suspension of sentence and probation by district court.

Whenever any defendant shall appear for sentence before a district court, the court may impose a sentence and suspend its execution, or place the defendant on probation without the imposition of a suspended sentence. The defendant may be placed on probation for the time and on any terms and conditions that the court may fix. The period of probation, together with any extension, shall not exceed one year, except that probation may be for a longer period in cases in which the district court may by law impose a sentence longer than one year; provided, that the period of probation shall not exceed the longest sentence which the court may impose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 45A; P.L. 1954, ch. 3362, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-13

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 25.

12-19-14.
Violation of terms of probation — Notice to court — Revocation or continuation of suspension.

Whenever any person who has been placed on probation by virtue of the suspension of execution of his or her sentence pursuant to §

12-19-13

violates the terms and conditions of his or her probation as fixed by the court by being formally charged with committing a new criminal offense, the police or department of corrections division of rehabilitative services shall cause the defendant to appear before the court. The department of corrections division of rehabilitative services shall determine when a technical violation of the terms and conditions of probation as fixed by the court that does not constitute a new criminal offense has occurred and shall cause the defendant to appear before the court. For technical violations, the division of rehabilitative services shall promptly render a written report relative to the conduct of the defendant, including, as applicable, a description of the clear and articulable public safety risk posed by a defendant accused of a technical violation, and, as available, the information contained in any report under §

12-13-24.1

. The division of rehabilitative services may recommend that the time served up to that point is a sufficient response to a violation that is not a new, alleged crime. The court may order the defendant held without bail for a period not exceeding ten (10) days excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays if the new criminal charge(s) constitutes a violent crime as defined in the Rhode Island General Laws, a domestic violence crime, or a crime involving driving under the influence or if the court determines in its discretion that public safety concerns and/or concerns regarding the defendant’s likelihood to appear before the court warrant holding the defendant without bail.

The court shall conduct a hearing within thirty (30) days of arrest, unless waived by the defendant, to determine whether the defendant has violated the terms and conditions of his or her probation, at which hearing the defendant shall have the opportunity to be present and to respond. Upon a determination by a fair preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has violated the terms and conditions of his or her probation, the court, in open court and in the presence of the defendant, may as to the court may seem just and proper:

Revoke the suspension and order the defendant committed on the sentence previously imposed, or on a lesser sentence;

Impose a sentence if one has not been previously imposed;

Stay all or a portion of the sentence imposed after removal of the suspension;

Continue the suspension of a sentence previously imposed; or

Convert a sentence of probation without incarceration to a suspended sentence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 45A; P.L. 1954, ch. 3362, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-14

; P.L. 1970, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 25; P.L. 1982, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 1, effective July 6, 2021.

12-19-15.
Term of probation — Power to commit after termination of original sentence.

The power of the court to commit the defendant shall not be deemed to terminate with the termination of the period of the original sentence, but the court shall have power to enforce the sentence even though the original period of the sentence has expired. The term of the suspended sentence may be longer or shorter or for the same time as the probation period, and the time during which the defendant is on probation shall not be deemed by §§

12-19-13

—

12-19-17

to be a part of the term of his or her sentence, although the court, in its discretion, may give consideration to the probationer’s conduct during the probationary period in imposing a sanction or enforcing the sentence originally imposed, or any lesser sentence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 45A; P.L. 1954, ch. 3362, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-15

; P.L. 2017, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 351, § 1.

12-19-16.
Suspension of imprisonment already commenced.

Imprisonment pursuant to a sentence, once commenced, shall not be subject to suspension by the district court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 45A; P.L. 1954, ch. 3362, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-16

.

12-19-17.
Powers of district court additional.

The power and authority by §§

12-19-13

—

12-19-16

vested in the district courts shall be deemed additional power and authority and shall not be deemed in substitution or derogation of any other power and authority previously vested in the district courts.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 45A; P.L. 1954, ch. 3362, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-17

.

12-19-18.
Termination of imprisonment on deferred sentence on failure of grand jury to indict — Determinations of insufficient evidence lack of probable cause or exercise of prosecutorial discretion.

Whenever any person has been sentenced to imprisonment for violation of a deferred sentence by reason of the alleged commission of a felony and the grand jury has failed to return any indictment or an information has not been filed on the charge which was specifically alleged to have constituted the violation of the deferred sentence, the sentence to imprisonment for the alleged violation of the deferred sentence shall, on motion made to the court on behalf of the person so sentenced, be quashed, and imprisonment shall be immediately terminated, and the deferred sentence shall have same force and effect as if no sentence to imprisonment had been imposed.

Whenever any person, after an evidentiary hearing, has been sentenced to imprisonment for violation of a suspended sentence or probationary period by reason of the alleged commission of a felony or misdemeanor said sentence of imprisonment shall, on a motion made to the court on behalf of the person so sentenced, be quashed, and imprisonment shall be terminated when any of the following occur on the charge which was specifically alleged to have constituted the violation:

After trial person is found “not guilty” or a motion for judgment of acquittal or to dismiss is made and granted pursuant to Superior or District Court Rule of Criminal Procedure 29;

After hearing evidence, a “no true bill” is returned by the grand jury;

After consideration by an assistant or special assistant designated by the attorney general, a “no information” based upon a lack of probable cause is returned;

A motion to dismiss is made and granted pursuant to the Rhode Island general laws §

12-12-1.7

and/or Superior Court Rule of Criminal Procedure 9.1; or

The charge fails to proceed in District or Superior Court under circumstances where the state is indicating a lack of probable cause, or circumstances where the state or its agents believe there is doubt about the culpability of the accused.

This section shall apply to all individuals sentenced to imprisonment for violation of a suspended sentence or probationary period by reason of the alleged commission of a felony or misdemeanor and shall not alter the ability of the court to revoke a suspended sentence or probationary period for an allegation of conduct that does not rise to the level of criminal conduct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2085, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-18

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 14; P.L. 2010, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 311, § 1.

12-19-19.
Sentencing on plea of guilty or nolo contendere — Deferment of sentence.

Whenever any person is arraigned before the superior court and pleads guilty or nolo contendere, he or she may be at any time sentenced by the court; provided, that if at any time the court formally defers sentencing, then the person and the court shall enter into a written deferral agreement to be filed with the clerk of the court. When a court formally defers sentence, the court may only impose sentence up to five (5) years from and after the date of the written deferral agreement, unless during the required period, the person shall be declared to have violated the terms and conditions of the deferment pursuant to subsection (b) in which event the court may impose sentence.

The court may require that the person agreeing to said deferment of sentence shall not violate any condition of the written deferral agreement. A violation of any condition set forth by the written deferral agreement shall violate the terms and conditions of the deferment of sentence and the court may impose a sanction or impose sentence. The determination of whether a violation has occurred shall be made by the court in accordance with procedures relating to violation of probation in court rules and §§

12-19-2

and

12-19-14

.

If a person, after the completion of the deferment period is determined by the court after a hearing to have complied with all of the terms and conditions of the deferral agreement including, but not limited to, the payment in full of any court-ordered fines, fees, costs, assessments, and restitution to victims of crime, then the person shall become immediately eligible for consideration for expungement pursuant to the provisions of §§

12-1.3-2

and

12-1.3-3

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 273, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 323, § 18; P.L. 1927, ch. 1063, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 496, § 18; P.L. 1945, ch. 1560, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-19

; P.L. 2010, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 202, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 204, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 351, § 1.

12-19-20.
[Obsolete.]

12-19-21.
Habitual criminals.

If any person who has been previously convicted in this or any other state of two (2) or more felony offenses arising from separate and distinct incidents and sentenced on two (2) or more occasions to serve a term in prison is, after the convictions and sentences, convicted in this state of any offense punished by imprisonment for more than one year, that person shall be deemed a “habitual criminal.” Upon conviction, the person deemed a habitual criminal shall be punished by imprisonment in the adult correctional institutions for a term not exceeding twenty-five (25) years, in addition to any sentence imposed for the offense of which he or she was last convicted. No conviction and sentence for which the person has subsequently received a pardon granted on the ground that he or she was innocent shall be considered a conviction and sentence for the purpose of determining whether the person is a habitual criminal.

Whenever it appears a person shall be deemed a “habitual criminal,” the attorney general, within forty-five (45) days of the arraignment, but in no case later than the date of the pretrial conference, may file with the court a notice specifying that the defendant, upon conviction, is subject to the imposition of an additional sentence in accordance with this section; provided, that in no case shall the fact that the defendant is alleged to be a habitual offender be an issue upon the trial of the defendant, nor shall it be disclosed to the jury. Upon any plea of guilty or nolo contendere or verdict or finding of guilty of the defendant, a hearing shall be held by the court sitting without a jury to determine whether the person so convicted is a habitual criminal. Notice shall be given to the defendant and the attorney general at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing. Duly authenticated copies of former judgments and commitments which comprise the two (2) or more prior convictions and imprisonments required under this section shall be prima facie evidence of the defendant’s former convictions and imprisonments. If it appears by a preponderance of the evidence presented that the defendant is a habitual criminal under this section, he or she shall be sentenced by the court to an additional consecutive term of imprisonment not exceeding twenty-five (25) years; and provided further, that the court shall order the defendant to serve a minimum number of years of the sentence before he or she becomes eligible for parole.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 68; P.L. 1896, ch. 336, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 68; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 71; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 71; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 64; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-21

; P.L. 1982, ch. 226, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 402, § 1.

12-19-22.
Infliction of punishment on sentence.

The various punishments prescribed for offenses shall be inflicted upon the offender upon the sentence of a court of competent jurisdiction.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 63; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 63; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 51; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 51; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 50; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-22

.

12-19-23.
Place of imprisonment.

Unless otherwise provided, every person now or hereafter sentenced to imprisonment shall be sentenced to and imprisoned in the adult correctional institutions.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 37; C.P.A. 1905, § 1186; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 37; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 38; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 38; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-23

.

12-19-23.1.
Intermediate punishments — Purpose.

The objectives of intermediate punishments include:

The provision of a realistic criminal sentencing alternative to incarceration for offenders consistent with the public safety;

protection of our citizenry through stringent supervision and monitoring of offenders;

The accountability of offenders and satisfaction of the retributive goal of sentencing through the use and enforcement of intermediate punishments;

The initiation and maintenance of an objectives-based plan of supervision that addresses personal and social development; and

The emphasis and promotion of offenders’ adherence to program requirements of employment/education, community service, victim restitution, financial responsibility, participation in treatment programs, and strict adherence to all conditions of intermediate punishments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 205, § 1.

12-19-23.2.
Intermediate punishments.

As a part of or in lieu of the sentences otherwise provided by law, the court may unless specifically restricted or authorized by law sentence any person who has been adjudged guilty of any crime after trial before a judge or a judge and jury or before a judge accepting the person’s plea of nolo contendere or guilty to the offense in the following manner:

By placement of the offender on unsupervised probation with or without special conditions;

By imposition of a sentence involving placement of the offender in supervised probation with field supervision rather than intensive supervision, with or without special conditions;

By imposition of a sentence of probation involving placement of the offender in intensive supervision or placement in an alternative confinement program established pursuant to §

12-19-2.2

without the necessity of an application of the director of the department of corrections or placement of the offender in community restitution, with or without special conditions;

By imposition of a sentence involving placement of the offender in community confinement pursuant to §

42-56-20.2

;

By imposition of a sentence involving placement of the offender in a minimum security facility which houses offenders who are preparing for their reintegration into the community;

By imposition of a fine as provided by law;

By imposition of any combination of the intermediate punishments provided in this subsection that justice requires and which the court in its discretion deems appropriate under the circumstances.

The director of corrections shall establish appropriate eligibility criteria and conditions for offenders sentenced to intermediate punishments as identified in subdivisions (a)(2) through (a)(5) of this section and may assign these functions to any subordinate employees and officers that may to him or her seem feasible or desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 435, § 2.

12-19-24.
Report of sentence and court recommendations.

After imposing sentence the court shall file with the director of corrections on forms that shall be provided by the director a report of any sentence and any recommendations that the director may deem necessary as to the security required for the proper custody of the accused so sentenced.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 76; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-24

.

12-19-25.
Warrant for commitment to institutions.

Whenever any person shall be sentenced to imprisonment, the clerk of the court passing the sentence shall immediately issue a warrant, under the seal of the court, directed to the division of sheriffs, reciting the sentence and requiring a deputy sheriff to take the person and deliver to the warden of the adult correctional institutions and the warden to receive the person into his or her custody and safely keep him or her in the institutions during the term specified in the sentence, and the warrant shall constitute the officer charged with it, while he or she has it in his or her possession for service, an officer in any county in this state into which it may be necessary for him or her to go, to all intents and purposes whatsoever.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 52; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 52; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 39; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 39; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-25

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 45.

12-19-26.
Sentence of minor to training school for youth.

Whenever any person under the age of eighteen (18) years shall be convicted by any court of any criminal offense, the court may sentence the person to the state training school for youth for a term not less than two (2) years, nor longer than his or her minority, or to any punishment that is otherwise provided by law for the same offense, and if the sentence is to the training school for youth, then it shall be in the alternative to the state training school for youth or to any punishment that would otherwise have been awarded; provided, that whenever the sentence is imposed, it shall be reduced by the number of days spent in confinement while awaiting trial and while awaiting sentencing.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 50; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 50; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 46; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 46; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 46; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-26

; P.L. 1989, ch. 133, § 1.

12-19-27.
Commitment to training school for youth.

Whenever any person shall be sentenced to imprisonment in the state training school for youth, the court passing the sentence shall immediately issue a warrant, under the seal of the court, directed to the division of sheriffs, or to any town sergeant or constable of any county in which the court is held, reciting the sentence and requiring a deputy sheriff, town sergeant, or constable to take the person so sentenced and deliver him or her to the superintendent of the training school, and the warrant shall constitute the officer charged with it, while he or she has the warrant in his or her possession for service, an officer in any county in this state into which it may be necessary for him to go, to all intents and purposes whatsoever.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 51; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 51; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 47; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 47; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 47; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1774, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-27

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 45.

12-19-28.
Repealed.

12-19-29.
Sentence to give recognizance to keep the peace.

In addition to the punishment prescribed by law, the district court may require the person to enter into recognizance, with sufficient surety and in any sum that it shall direct, with condition to keep the peace toward all the people of this state for a certain time thereafter, not exceeding eleven (11) months; and upon the refusal or neglect of the person to comply with that requirement, the same course shall be pursued as is provided on neglecting to comply with sentence in case of threats.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 176; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

12-19-29

.